Washington statutes.
RCW 43.12.055

Enforcement in accordance with RCW 43.05.100 and 43.05.110.

Enforcement action taken after July 23, 1995, by the commissioner of public lands or the supervisor of natural resources shall be in accordance with RCW 43.05.100 and 43.05.110.

[ 2003 c 334 s 103; 1995 c 403 s 622.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.